Illinois, session 104th, HB4976.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact Act. 6    Section 5. Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact. The 7State of Illinois ratifies and approves the following Compact: 8OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT  9SECTION 1. PURPOSE10The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate 11practice of Occupational Therapy with the goal of improving 12public access to Occupational Therapy services. The Practice 13of Occupational Therapy occurs in the State where the 14patient/client is located at the time of the patient/client 15encounter. The Compact preserves the regulatory authority of 16States to protect public health and safety through the current 17system of State licensure.18This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:19        A. Increase public access to Occupational Therapy 20    services by providing for the mutual recognition of other 21    Member State licenses;  HB4976- 2 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1        B. Enhance the States' ability to protect the public's 2    health and safety;3        C. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in 4    regulating multi-State Occupational Therapy Practice;5        D. Support spouses of relocating military members;6        E. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, 7    and disciplinary information between Member States;8        F. Allow a Remote State to hold a provider of services 9    with a Compact Privilege in that State accountable to that 10    State's practice standards; and11        G. Facilitate the use of Telehealth technology in 12    order to increase access to Occupational Therapy services. 13SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS14As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the 15following definitions shall apply:16    A. "Active Duty Military" means full-time duty status in 17the active uniformed service of the United States, including 18members of the National Guard and Reserve on active duty 19orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. Chapter 1209 and 10 U.S.C. 20Chapter 1211.21    B. "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, 22equitable, or criminal action permitted by a State's laws 23which is imposed by a Licensing Board or other authority 24against an Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy 25Assistant, including actions against an individual's license   HB4976- 3 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1or Compact Privilege such as censure, revocation, suspension, 2probation, monitoring of the Licensee, or restriction on the 3Licensee's practice.4    C. "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary 5monitoring process approved by an Occupational Therapy 6Licensing Board.7    D. "Compact Privilege" means the authorization, which is 8equivalent to a license, granted by a Remote State to allow a 9Licensee from another Member State to practice as an 10Occupational Therapist or practice as an Occupational Therapy 11Assistant in the Remote State under its laws and rules. The 12Practice of Occupational Therapy occurs in the Member State 13where the patient/client is located at the time of the 14patient/client encounter.15    E. "Continuing Competence/Education" means a requirement, 16as a condition of license renewal, to provide evidence of 17participation in, and/or completion of, educational and 18professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.19    F. "Current Significant Investigative Information" means 20Investigative Information that a Licensing Board, after an 21inquiry or investigation that includes notification and an 22opportunity for the Occupational Therapist or Occupational 23Therapy Assistant to respond, if required by State law, has 24reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would 25indicate more than a minor infraction.26    G. "Data System" means a repository of information about   HB4976- 4 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1Licensees, including but not limited to license status, 2Investigative Information, Compact Privileges, and Adverse 3Actions.4    H. "Encumbered License" means a license in which an 5Adverse Action restricts the Practice of Occupational Therapy 6by the Licensee or said Adverse Action has been reported to the 7National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB).8    I. "Executive Committee" means a group of directors 9elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers 10granted to them by, the Commission.11    J. "Home State" means the Member State that is the 12Licensee's Primary State of Residence.13    K. "Impaired Practitioner" means individuals whose 14professional practice is adversely affected by substance 15abuse, addiction, or other health-related conditions.16    L. "Investigative Information" means information, records, 17and/or documents received or generated by an Occupational 18Therapy Licensing Board pursuant to an investigation.19    M. "Jurisprudence Requirement" means the assessment of an 20individual's knowledge of the laws and rules governing the 21Practice of Occupational Therapy in a State.22    N. "Licensee" means an individual who currently holds an 23authorization from the State to practice as an Occupational 24Therapist or as an Occupational Therapy Assistant.25    O. "Member State" means a State that has enacted the 26Compact.  HB4976- 5 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    P. "Occupational Therapist" means an individual who is 2licensed by a State to practice Occupational Therapy.3    Q. "Occupational Therapy Assistant" means an individual 4who is licensed by a State to assist in the Practice of 5Occupational Therapy.6    R. "Occupational Therapy," "Occupational Therapy 7Practice," and the "Practice of Occupational Therapy" mean the 8care and services provided by an Occupational Therapist or an 9Occupational Therapy Assistant as set forth in the Member 10State's statutes and regulations.11    S. "Occupational Therapy Compact Commission" or 12"Commission" means the national administrative body whose 13membership consists of all States that have enacted the 14Compact.15    T. "Occupational Therapy Licensing Board" or "Licensing 16Board" means the agency of a State that is authorized to 17license and regulate Occupational Therapists and Occupational 18Therapy Assistants.19    U. "Primary State of Residence" means the state (also 20known as the Home State) in which an Occupational Therapist or 21Occupational Therapy Assistant who is not Active Duty Military 22declares a primary residence for legal purposes as verified 23by: driver's license, federal income tax return, lease, deed, 24mortgage or voter registration or other verifying 25documentation as further defined by Commission Rules.26    V. "Remote State" means a Member State other than the Home   HB4976- 6 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1State, where a Licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise 2the Compact Privilege.3    W. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by the Commission 4that has the force of law.5    X. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or 6territory of the United States of America that regulates the 7Practice of Occupational Therapy.8    Y. "Single-State License" means an Occupational Therapist 9or Occupational Therapy Assistant license issued by a Member 10State that authorizes practice only within the issuing State 11and does not include a Compact Privilege in any other Member 12State.13    Z. "Telehealth" means the application of telecommunication 14technology to deliver Occupational Therapy services for 15assessment, intervention and/or consultation. 16SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT17    A. To participate in the Compact, a Member State shall:18        1. License Occupational Therapists and Occupational 19    Therapy Assistants20        2. Participate fully in the Commission's Data System, 21    including but not limited to using the Commission's unique 22    identifier as defined in Rules of the Commission;23        3. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and 24    investigating complaints about Licensees;25        4. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms   HB4976- 7 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    of the Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the 2    availability of Investigative Information regarding a 3    Licensee;4        5. Implement or utilize procedures for considering the 5    criminal history records of applicants for an initial 6    Compact Privilege. These procedures shall include the 7    submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based 8    information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an 9    applicant's criminal history record information from the 10    Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible 11    for retaining that State's criminal records;12            a. A Member State shall, within a time frame 13        established by the Commission, require a criminal 14        background check for a Licensee seeking/applying for a 15        Compact Privilege whose Primary State of Residence is 16        that Member State, by receiving the results of the 17        Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal record 18        search, and shall use the results in making licensure 19        decisions.20            b. Communication between a Member State, the 21        Commission and among Member States regarding the 22        verification of eligibility for licensure through the 23        Compact shall not include any information received 24        from the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a 25        federal criminal records check performed by a Member 26        State under Public Law 92-544.  HB4976- 8 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1        6. Comply with the Rules of the Commission;2        7. Utilize only a recognized national examination as a 3    requirement for licensure pursuant to the Rules of the 4    Commission; and5        8. Have Continuing Competence/Education requirements 6    as a condition for license renewal.7    B. A Member State shall grant the Compact Privilege to a 8Licensee holding a valid unencumbered license in another 9Member State in accordance with the terms of the Compact and 10Rules.11    C. Member States may charge a fee for granting a Compact 12Privilege.13    D. A Member State shall provide for the State's delegate 14to attend all Occupational Therapy Compact Commission 15meetings.16    E. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall 17continue to be able to apply for a Member State's Single-State 18License as provided under the laws of each Member State. 19However, the Single-State License granted to these individuals 20shall not be recognized as granting the Compact Privilege in 21any other Member State.22    F. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements 23established by a Member State for the issuance of a 24Single-State License. 25SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE  HB4976- 9 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    A. To exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and 2provisions of the Compact, the Licensee shall:3        1. Hold a license in the Home State;4        2. Have a valid United States Social Security Number 5    or National Practitioner Identification number;6        3. Have no encumbrance on any State license;7        4. Be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Member 8    State in accordance with Section 4D, F, G, and H;9        5. Have paid all fines and completed all requirements 10    resulting from any Adverse Action against any license or 11    Compact Privilege, and two years have elapsed from the 12    date of such completion;13        6. Notify the Commission that the Licensee is seeking 14    the Compact Privilege within a Remote State(s);15        7. Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, 16    for the Compact Privilege;17        8. Complete a criminal background check in accordance 18    with Section 3A(5);19            a. The Licensee shall be responsible for the 20        payment of any fee associated with the completion of a 21        criminal background check.22        9. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by 23    the Remote State(s) in which the Licensee is seeking a 24    Compact Privilege; and25        10. Report to the Commission Adverse Action taken by 26    any non-Member State within 30 days from the date the   HB4976- 10 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    Adverse Action is taken.2    B. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration 3date of the Home State license. The Licensee must comply with 4the requirements of Section 4A to maintain the Compact 5Privilege in the Remote State.6    C. A Licensee providing Occupational Therapy in a Remote 7State under the Compact Privilege shall function within the 8laws and regulations of the Remote State.9    D. Occupational Therapy Assistants practicing in a Remote 10State shall be supervised by an Occupational Therapist 11licensed or holding a Compact Privilege in that Remote State.12    E. A Licensee providing Occupational Therapy in a Remote 13State is subject to that State's regulatory authority. A 14Remote State may, in accordance with due process and that 15State's laws, remove a Licensee's Compact Privilege in the 16Remote State for a specific period of time, impose fines, 17and/or take any other necessary actions to protect the health 18and safety of its citizens. The Licensee may be ineligible for 19a Compact Privilege in any State until the specific time for 20removal has passed and all fines are paid.21    F. If a Home State license is encumbered, the Licensee 22shall lose the Compact Privilege in any Remote State until the 23following occur:24        1. The Home State license is no longer encumbered; and25        2. Two years have elapsed from the date on which the 26    Home State license is no longer encumbered in accordance   HB4976- 11 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    with Section 4(F)(1).2    G. Once an Encumbered License in the Home State is 3restored to good standing, the Licensee must meet the 4requirements of Section 4A to obtain a Compact Privilege in 5any Remote State.6    H. If a Licensee's Compact Privilege in any Remote State 7is removed, the individual may lose the Compact Privilege in 8any other Remote State until the following occur:9        1. The specific period of time for which the Compact 10    Privilege was removed has ended;11        2. All fines have been paid and all conditions have 12    been met;13        3. Two years have elapsed from the date of completing 14    requirements for 4(H)(1) and (2); and15        4. The Compact Privileges are reinstated by the 16    Commission, and the compact Data System is updated to 17    reflect reinstatement.18    I. If a Licensee's Compact Privilege in any Remote State 19is removed due to an erroneous charge, privileges shall be 20restored through the compact Data System.21    J. Once the requirements of Section 4H have been met, the 22Licensee must meet the requirements in Section 4A to obtain a 23Compact Privilege in a Remote State. 24SECTION 5. OBTAINING A NEW HOME STATE LICENSE BY VIRTUE OF 25COMPACT PRIVILEGE  HB4976- 12 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    A. An Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy 2Assistant may hold a Home State license, which allows for 3Compact Privileges in Member States, in only one Member State 4at a time.5    B. If an Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy 6Assistant changes Primary State of Residence by moving between 7two Member States:8        1. The Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy 9    Assistant shall file an application for obtaining a new 10    Home State license by virtue of a Compact Privilege, pay 11    all applicable fees, and notify the current and new Home 12    State in accordance with applicable Rules adopted by the 13    Commission.14        2. Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new 15    Home State license by virtue of compact privilege, the new 16    Home State shall verify that the Occupational Therapist or 17    Occupational Therapy Assistant meets the pertinent 18    criteria outlined in Section 4 via the Data System, 19    without need for primary source verification except for:20            a. an FBI fingerprint based criminal background 21        check if not previously performed or updated pursuant 22        to applicable Rules adopted by the Commission in 23        accordance with Public Law 92-544;24            b. other criminal background check as required by 25        the new Home State; and26            c. submission of any requisite Jurisprudence   HB4976- 13 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1        Requirements of the new Home State.2        3. The former Home State shall convert the former Home 3    State license into a Compact Privilege once the new Home 4    State has activated the new Home State license in 5    accordance with applicable Rules adopted by the 6    Commission.7        4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this 8    Compact, if the Occupational Therapist or Occupational 9    Therapy Assistant cannot meet the criteria in Section 4, 10    the new Home State shall apply its requirements for 11    issuing a new Single-State License.12        5. The Occupational Therapist or the Occupational 13    Therapy Assistant shall pay all applicable fees to the new 14    Home State in order to be issued a new Home State license.15    C. If an Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy 16Assistant changes Primary State of Residence by moving from a 17Member State to a non-Member State, or from a non-Member State 18to a Member State, the State criteria shall apply for issuance 19of a Single-State License in the new State.20    D. Nothing in this compact shall interfere with a 21Licensee's ability to hold a Single-State License in multiple 22States; however, for the purposes of this compact, a Licensee 23shall have only one Home State license.24    E. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements 25established by a Member State for the issuance of a 26Single-State License.   HB4976- 14 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1SECTION 6. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES2    A. Active Duty Military personnel, or their spouses, shall 3designate a Home State where the individual has a current 4license in good standing. The individual may retain the Home 5State designation during the period the service member is on 6active duty. Subsequent to designating a Home State, the 7individual shall only change their Home State through 8application for licensure in the new State or through the 9process described in Section 5. 10SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS11    A. A Home State shall have exclusive power to impose 12Adverse Action against an Occupational Therapist's or 13Occupational Therapy Assistant's license issued by the Home 14State.15    B. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, 16a Remote State shall have the authority, in accordance with 17existing State due process law, to:18        1. Take Adverse Action against an Occupational 19    Therapist's or Occupational Therapy Assistant's Compact 20    Privilege within that Member State.21        2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and 22    investigations that require the attendance and testimony 23    of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. 24    Subpoenas issued by a Licensing Board in a Member State   HB4976- 15 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the 2    production of evidence from another Member State shall be 3    enforced in the latter State by any court of competent 4    jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of 5    that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings 6    pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any 7    witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees 8    required by the service statutes of the State in which the 9    witnesses or evidence are located.10    C. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State 11shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct 12received from a Member State as it would if the conduct had 13occurred within the Home State. In so doing, the Home State 14shall apply its own State laws to determine appropriate 15action.16    D. The Home State shall complete any pending 17investigations of an Occupational Therapist or Occupational 18Therapy Assistant who changes Primary State of Residence 19during the course of the investigations. The Home State, where 20the investigations were initiated, shall also have the 21authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall promptly 22report the conclusions of the investigations to the OT Compact 23Commission Data System. The Occupational Therapy Compact 24Commission Data System administrator shall promptly notify the 25new Home State of any Adverse Actions.26    E. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law,   HB4976- 16 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1may recover from the affected Occupational Therapist or 2Occupational Therapy Assistant the costs of investigations and 3disposition of cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken 4against that Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy 5Assistant.6    F. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the 7factual findings of the Remote State, provided that the Member 8State follows its own procedures for taking the Adverse 9Action.10    G. Joint Investigations11        1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member 12    State by its respective State Occupational Therapy laws 13    and regulations or other applicable State law, any Member 14    State may participate with other Member States in joint 15    investigations of Licensees.16        2. Member States shall share any investigative, 17    litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any 18    joint or individual investigation initiated under the 19    Compact.20    H. If an Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against 21an Occupational Therapist's or Occupational Therapy 22Assistant's license, the Occupational Therapist's or 23Occupational Therapy Assistant's Compact Privilege in all 24other Member States shall be deactivated until all 25encumbrances have been removed from the State license. All 26Home State disciplinary orders that impose Adverse Action   HB4976- 17 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1against an Occupational Therapist's or Occupational Therapy 2Assistant's license shall include a Statement that the 3Occupational Therapist's or Occupational Therapy Assistant's 4Compact Privilege is deactivated in all Member States during 5the pendency of the order.6    I. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall 7promptly notify the administrator of the Data System. The 8administrator of the Data System shall promptly notify the 9Home State of any Adverse Actions by Remote States.10    J. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State's 11decision that participation in an Alternative Program may be 12used in lieu of Adverse Action. 13SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY COMPACT 14COMMISSION15    A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a 16joint public agency known as the Occupational Therapy Compact 17Commission:18        1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact 19    States.20        2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or 21    against the Commission shall be brought solely and 22    exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the 23    principal office of the Commission is located. The 24    Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to 25    the extent it adopts or consents to participate in   HB4976- 18 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    alternative dispute resolution proceedings.2        3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a 3    waiver of sovereign immunity.4    B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings5        1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one 6    (1) delegate selected by that Member State's Licensing 7    Board.8        2. The delegate shall be either:9            a. A current member of the Licensing Board, who is 10        an Occupational Therapist, Occupational Therapy 11        Assistant, or public member; or12            b. An administrator of the Licensing Board.13        3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from 14    office as provided by the law of the State from which the 15    delegate is appointed.16        4. The Member State board shall fill any vacancy 17    occurring in the Commission within 90 days.18        5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote 19    with regard to the promulgation of Rules and creation of 20    bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to 21    participate in the business and affairs of the Commission. 22    A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as 23    provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for 24    delegates' participation in meetings by telephone or other 25    means of communication.26        6. The Commission shall meet at least once during each   HB4976- 19 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set 2    forth in the bylaws.3        7. The Commission shall establish by Rule a term of 4    office for delegates.5    C. The Commission shall have the following powers and 6duties:7        1. Establish a Code of Ethics for the Commission;8        2. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;9        3. Establish bylaws;10        4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with 11    the bylaws;12        5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with 13    the provisions of this Compact and the bylaws;14        6. Promulgate uniform Rules to facilitate and 15    coordinate implementation and administration of this 16    Compact. The Rules shall have the force and effect of law 17    and shall be binding in all Member States;18        7. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in 19    the name of the Commission, provided that the standing of 20    any State Occupational Therapy Licensing Board to sue or 21    be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;22        8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;23        9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of 24    personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a 25    Member State;26        10. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix   HB4976- 20 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    compensation, define duties, grant such individuals 2    appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the 3    Compact, and establish the Commission's personnel policies 4    and programs relating to conflicts of interest, 5    qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel 6    matters;7        11. Accept any and all appropriate donations and 8    grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and 9    services, and receive, utilize and dispose of the same; 10    provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any 11    appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;12        12. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or 13    donations of, or otherwise own, hold, improve or use, any 14    property, real, personal or mixed; provided that at all 15    times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of 16    impropriety;17        13. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 18    abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, 19    personal, or mixed;20        14. Establish a budget and make expenditures;21        15. Borrow money;22        16. Appoint committees, including standing committees 23    composed of members, State regulators, State legislators 24    or their representatives, and consumer representatives, 25    and such other interested persons as may be designated in 26    this Compact and the bylaws;  HB4976- 21 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1        17. Provide and receive information from, and 2    cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;3        18. Establish and elect an Executive Committee; and4        19. Perform such other functions as may be necessary 5    or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact 6    consistent with the State regulation of Occupational 7    Therapy licensure and practice.8    D. The Executive Committee9    The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on 10behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this 11Compact.12        1. The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine 13    members:14            a. Seven voting members who are elected by the 15        Commission from the current membership of the 16        Commission;17            b. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a 18        recognized national Occupational Therapy professional 19        association; and20            c. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a 21        recognized national Occupational Therapy certification 22        organization.23        2. The ex-officio members will be selected by their 24    respective organizations.25        3. The Commission may remove any member of the 26    Executive Committee as provided in bylaws.  HB4976- 22 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1        4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least 2    annually.3        5. The Executive Committee shall have the following 4    Duties and responsibilities:5            a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to 6        the Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact 7        legislation, fees paid by Compact Member States such 8        as annual dues, and any Commission Compact fee charged 9        to Licensees for the Compact Privilege;10            b. Ensure Compact administration services are 11        appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;12            c. Prepare and recommend the budget;13            d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the 14        Commission;15            e. Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and 16        provide compliance reports to the Commission;17            f. Establish additional committees as necessary; 18        and19            g. Perform other duties as provided in Rules or 20        bylaws.21    E. Meetings of the Commission22        1. All meetings shall be open to the public, and 23    public notice of meetings shall be given in the same 24    manner as required under the Rulemaking provisions in 25    Section 10.26        2. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other   HB4976- 23 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, 2    non-public meeting if the Commission or Executive 3    Committee or other committees of the Commission must 4    discuss:5            a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its 6        obligations under the Compact;7            b. The employment, compensation, discipline or 8        other matters, practices or procedures related to 9        specific employees or other matters related to the 10        Commission's internal personnel practices and 11        procedures;12            c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated 13        litigation;14            d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, 15        lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate;16            e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally 17        censuring any person;18            f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or 19        financial information that is privileged or 20        confidential;21            g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature 22        where disclosure would constitute a clearly 23        unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;24            h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled 25        for law enforcement purposes;26            i. Disclosure of information related to any   HB4976- 24 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1        investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or 2        for use of the Commission or other committee charged 3        with responsibility of investigation or determination 4        of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact; or5            j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure 6        by federal or Member State statute.7        3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed 8    pursuant to this provision, the Commission's legal counsel 9    or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed 10    and shall reference each relevant exempting provision.11        4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and 12    clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and 13    shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions 14    taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description 15    of the views expressed. All documents considered in 16    connection with an action shall be identified in such 17    minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting 18    shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority 19    vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent 20    jurisdiction.21    F. Financing of the Commission22        1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the 23    payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, 24    organization, and ongoing activities. 25        2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate 26    revenue sources, donations, and grants of money,   HB4976- 25 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    equipment, supplies, materials, and services.2        3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual 3    assessment from each Member State or impose fees on other 4    parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities 5    of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total 6    amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved 7    by the Commission each year for which revenue is not 8    provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment 9    amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be 10    determined by the Commission, which shall promulgate a 11    Rule binding upon all Member States.12        4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any 13    kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the 14    same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of 15    the Member States, except by and with the authority of the 16    Member State.17        5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 18    receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements 19    of the Commission shall be subject to the audit and 20    accounting procedures established under its bylaws. 21    However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled 22    by the Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified 23    or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit 24    shall be included in and become part of the annual report 25    of the Commission.26    G. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification  HB4976- 26 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1        1. The members, officers, executive director, 2    employees and representatives of the Commission shall be 3    immune from suit and liability, either personally or in 4    their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or 5    loss of property or personal injury or other civil 6    liability caused by or arising out of any actual or 7    alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the 8    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 9    basis for believing occurred within the scope of 10    Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; 11    provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed 12    to protect any such person from suit and/or liability for 13    any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the 14    intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that 15    person.16        2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, 17    executive director, employee, or representative of the 18    Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability 19    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or 20    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 21    employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the 22    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 23    basis for believing occurred within the scope of 24    Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; 25    provided that nothing herein shall be construed to 26    prohibit that person from retaining his or her own   HB4976- 27 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    counsel; and provided further, that the actual or alleged 2    act, error, or omission did not result from that person's 3    intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.4        3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless 5    any member, officer, executive director, employee, or 6    representative of the Commission for the amount of any 7    settlement or judgment obtained against that person 8    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or 9    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 10    employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such 11    person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 12    within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or 13    responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 14    error, or omission did not result from the intentional or 15    willful or wanton misconduct of that person. 16SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM17    A. The Commission shall provide for the development, 18maintenance, and utilization of a coordinated database and 19reporting system containing licensure, Adverse Action, and 20Investigative Information on all licensed individuals in 21Member States.22    B. A Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the 23Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is 24applicable (utilizing a unique identifier) as required by the 25Rules of the Commission, including:  HB4976- 28 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1        1. Identifying information;2        2. Licensure data;3        3. Adverse Actions against a license or Compact 4    Privilege;5        4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative 6    Program participation;7        5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the 8    reason(s) for such denial;9        6. Other information that may facilitate the 10    administration of this Compact, as determined by the Rules 11    of the Commission; and12        7. Current Significant Investigative Information.13    C. Current Significant Investigative Information and other 14Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any 15Member State will only be available to other Member States.16    D. The Commission shall promptly notify all Member States 17of any Adverse Action taken against a Licensee or an 18individual applying for a license. Adverse Action information 19pertaining to a Licensee in any Member State will be available 20to any other Member State.21    E. Member States contributing information to the Data 22System may designate information that may not be shared with 23the public without the express permission of the contributing 24State.25    F. Any information submitted to the Data System that is 26subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the Member   HB4976- 29 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1State contributing the information shall be removed from the 2Data System. 3SECTION 10. RULEMAKING4    A. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers 5pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the 6Rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become 7binding as of the date specified in each Rule or amendment.8    B. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in 9order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of 10the Compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the 11Commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that 12is beyond the scope of the purposes of the Compact, or the 13powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the 14Commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect.15    C. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States 16rejects a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the 17same manner used to adopt the Compact within 4 years of the 18date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no 19further force and effect in any Member State.20    D. Rules or amendments to the Rules shall be adopted at a 21regular or special meeting of the Commission.22    E. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final Rule or 23Rules by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in 24advance of the meeting at which the Rule will be considered and 25voted upon, the Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed   HB4976- 30 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1Rulemaking:2        1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly 3    accessible platform; and4        2. On the website of each Member State Occupational 5    Therapy Licensing Board or other publicly accessible 6    platform or the publication in which each State would 7    otherwise publish proposed Rules.8    F. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:9        1. The proposed time, date, and location of the 10    meeting in which the Rule will be considered and voted 11    upon;12        2. The text of the proposed Rule or amendment and the 13    reason for the proposed Rule;14        3. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from 15    any interested person; and16        4. The manner in which interested persons may submit 17    notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the 18    public hearing and any written comments.19    G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission 20shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, 21and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.22    H. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public 23hearing before it adopts a Rule or amendment if a hearing is 24requested by:25        1. At least twenty five (25) persons;26        2. A State or federal governmental subdivision or   HB4976- 31 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    agency; or2        3. An association or organization having at least 3    twenty five (25) members.4    I. If a hearing is held on the proposed Rule or amendment, 5the Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the 6scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is held via 7electronic means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism 8for access to the electronic hearing.9        1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing 10    shall notify the executive director of the Commission or 11    other designated member in writing of their desire to 12    appear and testify at the hearing not less than five (5) 13    business days before the scheduled date of the hearing.14        2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing 15    each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable 16    opportunity to comment orally or in writing.17        3. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the 18    recording will be made available on request.19        4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as 20    requiring a separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be 21    grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings 22    required by this section.23    J. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close 24of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was 25not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral 26comments received.  HB4976- 32 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    K. If no written notice of intent to attend the public 2hearing by interested parties is received, the Commission may 3proceed with promulgation of the proposed Rule without a 4public hearing.5    L. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, 6take final action on the proposed Rule and shall determine the 7effective date of the Rule, if any, based on the Rulemaking 8record and the full text of the Rule.9    M. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the 10Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule without 11prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided 12that the usual Rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact 13and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule 14as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety 15(90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the 16purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must 17be adopted immediately in order to:18        1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, 19    or welfare;20        2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;21        3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an 22    administrative Rule that is established by federal law or 23    Rule; or24        4. Protect public health and safety.25    N. The Commission or an authorized committee of the 26Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule   HB4976- 33 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, 2errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical 3errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the 4website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to 5challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after 6posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that 7the revision results in a material change to a Rule. A 8challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the chair 9of the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no 10challenge is made, the revision will take effect without 11further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision 12may not take effect without the approval of the Commission. 13SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT14    A. Oversight15        1. The executive, legislative, and judicial branches 16    of State government in each Member State shall enforce 17    this Compact and take all actions necessary and 18    appropriate to effectuate the Compact's purposes and 19    intent. The provisions of this Compact and the Rules 20    promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory 21    law. 22        2. All courts shall take judicial notice of the 23    Compact and the Rules in any judicial or administrative 24    proceeding in a Member State pertaining to the subject 25    matter of this Compact which may affect the powers,   HB4976- 34 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    responsibilities, or actions of the Commission.2        3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service 3    of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing 4    to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. 5    Failure to provide service of process to the Commission 6    shall render a judgment or order void as to the 7    Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.8    B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination9        1. If the Commission determines that a Member State 10    has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or 11    responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated 12    Rules, the Commission shall:13            a. Provide written notice to the defaulting State 14        and other Member States of the nature of the default, 15        the proposed means of curing the default and/or any 16        other action to be taken by the Commission; and17            b. Provide remedial training and specific 18        technical assistance regarding the default.19        2. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the 20    defaulting State may be terminated from the Compact upon 21    an affirmative vote of a majority of the Member States, 22    and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this 23    Compact may be terminated on the effective date of 24    termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the 25    offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred 26    during the period of default.  HB4976- 35 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1        3. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be 2    imposed only after all other means of securing compliance 3    have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or 4    terminate shall be given by the Commission to the 5    governor, the majority and minority leaders of the 6    defaulting State's legislature, and each of the Member 7    States.8        4. A State that has been terminated is responsible for 9    all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred 10    through the effective date of termination, including 11    obligations that extend beyond the effective date of 12    termination.13        5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to 14    a State that is found to be in default or that has been 15    terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing 16    between the Commission and the defaulting State.17        6. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the 18    Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the 19    District of Columbia or the federal district where the 20    Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing 21    member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, 22    including reasonable attorney's fees.23    C. Dispute Resolution24        1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission 25    shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact 26    that arise among Member States and between member and   HB4976- 36 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1    non-Member States.2        2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing 3    for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for 4    disputes as appropriate.5    D. Enforcement6        1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its 7    discretion, shall enforce the provisions and Rules of this 8    Compact.9        2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal 10    action in the United States District Court for the 11    District of Columbia or the federal district where the 12    Commission has its principal offices against a Member 13    State in default to enforce compliance with the provisions 14    of the Compact and its promulgated Rules and bylaws. The 15    relief sought may include both injunctive relief and 16    damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, 17    the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such 18    litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.19        3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive 20    remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any 21    other remedies available under federal or State law. 22SECTION 12. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE INTERSTATE 23COMMISSION FOR OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED 24RULES, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT25    A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which   HB4976- 37 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1the Compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth Member 2State. The provisions, which become effective at that time, 3shall be limited to the powers granted to the Commission 4relating to assembly and the promulgation of Rules. 5Thereafter, the Commission shall meet and exercise Rulemaking 6powers necessary to the implementation and administration of 7the Compact.8    B. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the 9Commission's initial adoption of the Rules shall be subject to 10the Rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact 11becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been previously 12adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect 13of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that State.14    C. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by 15enacting a statute repealing the same.16        1. A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect 17    until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing 18    statute.19        2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing 20    requirement of the withdrawing State's Occupational 21    Therapy Licensing Board to comply with the investigative 22    and Adverse Action reporting requirements of this act 23    prior to the effective date of withdrawal.24    D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to 25invalidate or prevent any Occupational Therapy licensure 26agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member   HB4976- 38 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1State and a non-Member State that does not conflict with the 2provisions of this Compact.3    E. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No 4amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding 5upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws of all 6Member States. 7SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY8This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate 9the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be 10severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of 11this Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of 12any Member State or of the United States or the applicability 13thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is 14held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact 15and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, 16person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this 17Compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any 18Member State, the Compact shall remain in full force and 19effect as to the remaining Member States and in full force and 20effect as to the Member State affected as to all severable 21matters. 22SECTION 14. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS23    A. A Licensee providing Occupational Therapy in a Remote 24State under the Compact Privilege shall function within the   HB4976- 39 -LRB104 17979 RTM 31416 b1laws and regulations of the Remote State. 2    B. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other 3law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the 4Compact.5    C. Any laws in a Member State in conflict with the Compact 6are superseded to the extent of the conflict.7    D. Any lawful actions of the Commission, including all 8Rules and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding 9upon the Member States.10    E. All agreements between the Commission and the Member 11States are binding in accordance with their terms.12    F. In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the 13constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any Member 14State, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the 15conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that 16Member State.